Missouri, session 2026, SB1567.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 170.027, to read as
follows:
170.027. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Integrated Safe Driving Program".
2. As used in this section, "driver education
instruction and training" means instruction and training
provided under the Missouri integrated safe driving program
that offers instruction in the use and operation of motor
vehicles including, but not limited to, instruction in the
safe operation of motor vehicles and rules of the road and
the laws of this state relating to motor vehicles.
3. (1) The department of elementary and secondary
education shall receive and review sample lessons from
recognized statewide professional organizations and
districts that meet the requirements of the Missouri
integrated safe driving program.
(2) Sample lessons shall be made available to each
public school district and charter school offering courses
to pupils in grades nine through twelve.

SB 1567 2
(3) For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent
school years, each public school district and charter school
offering courses to pupils in grades nine through twelve may
adopt a plan implementing the Missouri integrated safe
driving program, which may use the sample lessons.
4. The Missouri integrated safe driving program shall:
(1) Inform pupils about the requirements for obtaining
and driving with an instruction permit, an intermediate
license, and a full driver license under Missouri's
graduated driver license law as established in chapter 302;
(2) Emphasize the development of knowledge, attitudes,
habits, and skills necessary for the safe operation of motor
vehicles;
(3) Provide instruction on distracted driving as a
major traffic safety issue;
(4) Provide instruction concerning law enforcement
procedures for traffic stops, including a demonstration of
the proper actions to be taken during a traffic stop and
appropriate interactions with law enforcement; and
(5) Provide pupils with current data on driver safety
related to risky behaviors.
5. Districts may require pupils to participate in
lessons devoted to addressing the requirements of the
Missouri integrated safe driving program in courses as
determined by the district. These lessons shall meet
standards within the content of the course but use safe
driving as the context and application of the course
standards.
6. (1) The driver education instruction and training
under this section shall not require any pupil to physically
operate a motor vehicle as part of such instruction and
training.

SB 1567 3
(2) This section shall not be construed to prohibit
any public school district or charter school from offering
an elective driver education course that is different from
the driver education instruction and training required under
this section.
7. The state board of education may promulgate all
necessary rules and regulations for the administration of
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term
is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓